District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-302.02

Duration of personal jurisdiction.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 202, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(1)(C), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222

History

1981 Ed., § 30-342.2.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 16-137 rewrote section, which had read as follows: “§ 46-302.02. Procedure when exercising jurisdiction over nonresident. ”The Family Division, if it is exercising personal jurisdiction over a nonresident under § 46-302.01, may apply § 46-303.15 (special rules of evidence and procedure) to receive evidence from another state, and § 46-303.17 (assistance with discovery) to obtain discovery through a tribunal of another state. In all other respects, subchapters III through VII of this chapter do not apply and the tribunal shall apply the procedural and substantive law of the District, including the rules on choice of law other than those established by this chapter.”

Effect of Amendments

Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”

Effective Dates

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 202 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).

Editor's Notes